Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-389
Residential
facility; person with an
intellectual disability; removal; notice; procedure.

A person admitted to a residential facility under the provisions
of sections 83-217, 83-218, and 83-381 to 83-390 shall be immediately discharged
from the residential facility after notice of intention to remove the person
with an intellectual disability has
been given by the person authorized to make an application for admission under
subsection (1) of section 83-383 and the normal discharge procedures are completed.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 9, p. 3066;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 52;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 58.